test/src/morphology/N-bes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - bes - ok : #
     bes+N: bes
     1Sg+bes+N+PNS: sebezé
     2Sg+bes+N+PNS: nebezé
     3Sg+bes+N+PNS: bebezé
     4Sg+bes+N+PNS: yebezé
     1Du+bes+N+PNS: nuhebezé
     2Du+bes+N+PNS: nuhebezé
     1Pl+bes+N+PNS: nuhebezé
     2Pl+bes+N+PNS: nuhebezé
     3Pl+bes+N+PNS: hubebezé
     Unsp+bes+N+PNS: ɂebezé
     Ar+bes+N+PNS: hobezé
